District of Columbia statutes.
18-109

Revocation of wills; revival.

(a)

A will or codicil, or a part thereof, may not be revoked, except by implication of law, otherwise than by

(1)

a later will, codicil, or other writing declaring the revocation, executed as provided by section 18-103 or 18-107; or

(2)

burning, tearing, cancelling, or obliterating the will or codicil, or the part thereof, with the intention of revoking it, by the testator himself, or by a person in his presence and by his express direction and consent.

(b)

A will or codicil, or a part thereof, after it is revoked, may not be revived otherwise than by its re-execution, or by a codicil executed as provided in the case of wills, and then only to the extent to which an intention to revive is shown.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 18-109.
1973 Ed., § 18-109.
Application of dower rights to husband and wife: Section 3 of the Act of September 14, 1965, provided: “Effective Mar. 15, 1962, all provisions of the Act entitled ‘An Act to establish a code of law for the District of Columbia’, approved Mar. 3, 1901, as amended, and all other laws in force in the District of Columbia, relating to the right of dower and its incidents, apply to both husband and wife.”